Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Discipline.

§ 22.1-276.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Cross references.

As to school board action regarding destruction of property, see now § 22.1-280.4.

Editor’s note.

Repealed § 22.1-276 was rewritten by Acts 2001, c. 668, to read: “A school board may take action against a pupil for any actual breakage or destruction of or failure to return property owned by or under the control of the school board caused or committed by such pupil in pursuit of his studies.” Section 22.1-280.4, enacted by Acts 2001, cc. 688, 820, incorporates the changes made to repealed § 22.1-276 by Acts 2001, c. 668.

Former § 22.1-276, relating to liability of pupils for destruction of property, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-200; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-276.01.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Alternative education program” includes night school, adult education, or any other education program designed to offer instruction to students for whom the regular program of instruction may be inappropriate.“Bullying” means any aggressive and unwanted behavior that is intended to harm, intimidate, or humiliate the victim; involves a real or perceived power imbalance between the aggressor or aggressors and victim; and is repeated over time or causes severe emotional trauma. “Bullying” includes cyber bullying. “Bullying” does not include ordinary teasing, horseplay, argument, or peer conflict.“Disruptive behavior” means a violation of school board regulations governing student conduct that interrupts or obstructs the learning environment.“Dress or grooming code” means any practice, policy, or portion of a code of student conduct adopted by a school board that governs or restricts the attire, appearance, or grooming, including hairstyle, of any enrolled student.“Exclusion” means a Virginia school board’s denial of school admission to a student who has been expelled or has been placed on a long-term suspension of more than 30 calendar days by another school board or a private school, either in Virginia or another state, or for whom admission has been withdrawn by a private school in Virginia or another state.“Expulsion” means any disciplinary action imposed by a school board or a committee thereof, as provided in school board policy, whereby a student is not permitted to attend school within the school division and is ineligible for readmission for 365 calendar days after the date of the expulsion.“Long-term suspension” means any disciplinary action whereby a student is not permitted to attend school for 11 to 45 school days.“Short-term suspension” means any disciplinary action whereby a student is not permitted to attend school for a period not to exceed 10 school days.

For the purposes of §§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, 22.1-277.2, and 22.1-277.2:1, “superintendent’s designee” means a (i) trained hearing officer or (ii) professional employee within the administrative offices of the school division who reports directly to the division superintendent and who is not a school-based instructional or administrative employee.

History.

2001, cc. 688, 820; 2013, c. 575; 2018, c. 491; 2020, c. 678.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 575, in subsection A, substituted “requires a different meaning” for “clearly indicates otherwise” in the introductory paragraph, substituted “includes” for “shall include, but shall not be limited to” in the paragraph defining “Alternative education program,” and added the paragraph defining “Bullying”; in subsection B, deleted “22.1-277” preceding “22.1-277.04,” and “22.1-277.06” preceding “22.1-277.2.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 491 substituted “11 to 45 school days” for “more than 10 school days but less than 365 calendar days” in the definition for “Long-term suspension.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 678 added the definition of “Dress or grooming code” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For note on school discipline and the handicapped child, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1453 (1982).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Discrimination. —

Because the power to protect students and employees from discrimination in the public school system is a power fairly implied from the express grant of authority to school boards under Article VIII, § 7 of the Constitution of Virginia and from the specific authority granted to boards by the General Assembly in §§ 22.1-28, 22.1-78 and 22.1-253.13:7, the Dillon Rule does not prevent school boards from amending their antidiscrimination policies to prohibit discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Adam P. Ebbin, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-080, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/4/15).

§ 22.1-276.1.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1992, c. 611, and expired by its own terms on July 1, 1994.

§ 22.1-276.2.
Removal of students from classes.

Teachers shall have the initial authority to remove a student for disruptive behavior from a class.

Each school board shall establish, within the regulations governing student conduct required by § 22.1-279.6:

Criteria for teachers to remove disruptive students from their classes;

Requirements for incident reports of disruptive behavior to school administrators and any other documentation to support such removals from class;

Procedures for the written notification of a student and his parents of any incident report and its contents and for the opportunity to meet with the teacher and school administrators to discuss the student’s behavior and the possible consequences if such behavior does not cease;

Guidelines for the alternative assignment and instruction of such students and for the duration of such removals; and

Procedures for the return of students to class, for teacher participation in any decision by the principal to return a student to the class from which he has been removed, and for the resolution of any disagreements between such principal and teacher regarding such return.

The principal shall, unless a student who has been removed from class is suspended or expelled from school attendance, ensure that such student continues to receive an education.

Any teacher whose evaluation indicates deficiencies in the management of student conduct may be required by the school board to attend professional development activities designed to improve classroom management and disciplinary skills.

Application of this section to students with disabilities shall be in accordance with state and federal law and regulations.

This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict other school board policies and regulations for maintaining order in the classroom.

History.

1997, c. 830; 2001, cc. 688, 820.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 deleted the last sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “For the purposes of this section, ‘disruptive behavior’ means a violation of school board regulations governing student conduct that interrupts or obstructs the learning environment,” and substituted “§ 22.1-279.6” for “§ 22.1-278” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 22.1-276.3.
Ineligibility of students to compete in athletic competitions.

Any nonprofit corporation founded in Virginia in 1913 that currently organizes and governs interscholastic activities among the public high schools shall develop, implement, and enforce rules requiring that a student who is a member of a school athletic team be ineligible for two school years to compete in interscholastic athletic competition, if it has been determined by the school principal and division superintendent that the student used anabolic steroids during the training period immediately preceding or during the sport season of the athletic team, unless such steroid was prescribed by a licensed physician for a medical condition.

History.

2005, c. 481.

§ 22.1-277.
Suspensions and expulsions of students generally.

Students may be suspended or expelled from attendance at school for sufficient cause; however, in no cases may sufficient cause for suspensions include only instances of truancy.

Except as provided in subsection C or § 22.1-277.07 or 22.1-277.08, no student in preschool through grade three shall be suspended for more than three school days or expelled from attendance at school, unless (i) the offense involves physical harm or credible threat of physical harm to others or (ii) the local school board or the division superintendent or his designee finds that aggravating circumstances exist, as defined by the Department.

Any student for whom the division superintendent of the school division in which such student is enrolled has received a report pursuant to § 16.1-305.1 of an adjudication of delinquency or a conviction for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260 may be suspended or expelled from school attendance pursuant to this article.

The authority provided in § 22.1-276.2 for teachers to remove students from their classes in certain instances of disruptive behavior shall not be interpreted to affect the operation of § 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, or 22.1-277.06.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 22.1-277.08, no school board shall be required to suspend or expel any student who holds a valid written certification for the use of cannabis oil issued by a practitioner in accordance with subsection B of §

54.1-3408.3

for the possession or use of such oil in accordance with the student’s individualized health plan and in compliance with a policy adopted by the school board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-230.1, 22-230.2; 1972, c. 604; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 415; 1997, cc. 371, 585, 608, 734, 830; 1998, cc. 355, 379, § 22.1-277.02; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, c. 119; 2009, c. 70; 2018, c. 585; 2019, cc. 573, 574.

Cross references.

As to optional education programs for kindergarten through grade five, see § 22.1-200.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 573 and 574, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health Professions, in coordination with the Department of Education, shall develop and make available to school boards a standardized form that is to be completed by a practitioner who issues a written certification and a pharmaceutical processor that dispenses the cannabidiol oil or THC-A oil to a student. A completed form shall identify the student; specify the dosage of the cannabidiol oil or THC-A oil, the frequency in which it is to be administered, and any other circumstances that may warrant its use; and provide other relevant information.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “cannabis oil” was substituted for “cannabidiol oil or THC-A oil” in subsection E to conform to the amendment of §

54.1-3408.3

by Acts 2020, c. 1278.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 added present subsection B, deleted former subsections B through E, redesignated former subsection F as present subsection C, and substituted “§§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, or § 22.1-277.06” for “this section” in subsection C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 inserted “for an offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260” in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 70 added the language beginning “however, in no cases” at the end in subsection A; and substituted “§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, or 22.1-277.06” for “§§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, or § 22.1-277.06” in subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 585 substituted “Students” for “Pupils” in subsection A; inserted subsection B; and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 573 and 574 are identical, and added subsection E.

Law Review.

For note on school discipline and the handicapped child, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1453 (1982).

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§§ 22.1-277.01 through 22.1-277.03.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Cross references.

As to optional education programs for kindergarten through grade five, see § 22.1-200.1.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 22.1-277.01 through 22.1-277.03,
relating to expulsion of students, searches of students, profane or obscene language or conduct, and re-admission of suspended and expelled students to public schools was derived from Acts 1995, cc. 724, 801; 1997, c. 371; 1998, cc. 355, 655, 806; 1999, cc. 650, 706, 707, 732, 1027; 2000, cc. 360, 523, 648.

§ 22.1-277.04.
Short-term suspension; procedures; readmission.

A pupil may be suspended for not more than ten school days by either the school principal, any assistant principal, or, in their absence, any teacher. The principal, assistant principal, or teacher may suspend the pupil after giving the pupil oral or written notice of the charges against him and, if he denies them, an explanation of the facts as known to school personnel and an opportunity to present his version of what occurred. In the case of any pupil whose presence poses a continuing danger to persons or property, or whose presence is an ongoing threat of disruption, the pupil may be removed from school immediately and the notice, explanation of facts, and opportunity to present his version shall be given as soon as practicable thereafter.

Upon suspension of any pupil, the principal, assistant principal, or teacher responsible for such suspension shall report the facts of the case in writing to the division superintendent or his designee and the parent of the pupil suspended. The division superintendent or his designee shall review forthwith the action taken by the principal, assistant principal, or teacher upon a petition for such review by any party in interest and confirm or disapprove such action based on an examination of the record of the pupil’s behavior.

The decision of the division superintendent or his designee may be appealed to the school board or a committee thereof in accordance with regulations of the school board; however, the decision of the division superintendent or his designee shall be final if so prescribed by school board regulations.

The school board shall require that any oral or written notice to the parent of a student who is suspended from school attendance for not more than ten days include notification of the length of the suspension, information regarding the availability of community-based educational programs, alternative education programs or other educational options, and of the student’s right to return to regular school attendance upon the expiration of the suspension. The costs of any community-based educational program, or alternative education program or educational option, which is not a part of the educational program offered by the school division, shall be borne by the parent of the student.

School boards shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure that suspended students are able to access and complete graded work during and after the suspension.

History.

1998, c. 806, § 22.1-277.03; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2020, c. 337.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 337 added the last paragraph of the section.

§ 22.1-277.05.
Long-term suspensions; procedures; readmission.

A pupil may be suspended from attendance at school for 11 to 45 school days after providing written notice to the pupil and his parent of the proposed action and the reasons therefor and of the right to a hearing before the school board, or a committee thereof, or the superintendent or his designee, in accordance with regulations of the school board. If the regulations provide for a hearing by the superintendent or his designee, the regulations shall also provide for an appeal of the decision to the full school board. Such appeal shall be decided by the school board within 30 days.If the regulations provide for a hearing by a committee of the school board, the regulations shall also provide that such committee may confirm or disapprove the suspension of a student. Any such committee of the school board shall be composed of at least three members. If the committee’s decision is not unanimous, the pupil or his parent may appeal the committee’s decision to the full school board. Such appeal shall be decided by the school board within 30 days.

A school board shall include in the written notice of a suspension for 11 to 45 school days required by this section notification of the length of the suspension. In the case of a suspension for 11 to 45 school days, such written notice shall provide information concerning the availability of community-based educational, alternative education, or intervention programs. Such notice shall also state that the student is eligible to return to regular school attendance upon the expiration of the suspension or to attend an appropriate alternative education program approved by the school board during or upon the expiration of the suspension. The costs of any community-based educational, alternative education, or intervention program that is not a part of the educational program offered by the school division that the student may attend during his suspension shall be borne by the parent of the student.Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the school board from permitting or requiring students suspended pursuant to this section to attend an alternative education program provided by the school board for the term of such suspension.School boards shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure that suspended students are able to access and complete graded work during and after the suspension.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B, a long-term suspension may extend beyond a 45-school-day period but shall not exceed 364 calendar days if (i) the offense is one described in § 22.1-277.07 or 22.1-277.08 or involves serious bodily injury or (ii) the school board or division superintendent or his designee finds that aggravating circumstances exist, as defined by the Department. Such definition shall include a consideration of a student’s disciplinary history.

History.

1998, c. 806, § 22.1-277.03; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2018, c. 491; 2020, c. 337.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 491 substituted “11 to 45 school days” for “more than ten days” throughout the section; added subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 337 added the last paragraph in subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 22.1-277.06.
Expulsions; procedures; readmission.

Pupils may be expelled from attendance at school after written notice to the pupil and his parent of the proposed action and the reasons therefor and of the right to a hearing before the school board or a committee thereof in accordance with regulations of the school board.If the regulations provide for a hearing by a committee of the school board, the regulations shall also provide that such committee may confirm or disapprove the expulsion of a student. Any such committee of the school board shall be composed of at least three members. If the committee’s decision is not unanimous, the pupil or his parent may appeal the committee’s decision to the full school board. Such appeal shall be decided by the school board within 30 days.The regulations shall also provide for subsequent confirmation or disapproval of the proposed expulsion by the school board, or a committee thereof, as may be provided in regulation, regardless of whether the pupil exercised the right to a hearing.

The written notice required by this section shall include notification of the length of the expulsion and shall provide information to the parent of the student concerning the availability of community-based educational, training, and intervention programs. Such notice shall state further whether or not the student is eligible to return to regular school attendance, or to attend an appropriate alternative education program approved by the school board, or an adult education program offered by the school division, during or upon the expiration of the expulsion, and the terms or conditions of such readmission. The costs of any community-based educational, training, or intervention program that is not a part of the educational program offered by the school division that the student may attend during his expulsion shall be borne by the parent of the student.Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the school board from permitting or requiring students expelled pursuant to this section to attend an alternative education program provided by the school board for the term of such expulsion.If the school board determines that the student is ineligible to return to regular school attendance or to attend during the expulsion an alternative education program or an adult education program in the school division, the written notice shall also advise the parent of such student that the student may petition the school board for readmission to be effective one calendar year from the date of his expulsion, and of the conditions, if any, under which readmission may be granted.School boards shall establish, by regulation, a schedule pursuant to which such students may apply and reapply for readmission to school. Such schedule shall be designed to ensure that any initial petition for readmission will be reviewed by the school board or a committee thereof, or the division superintendent, and, if granted, would enable the student to resume school attendance one calendar year from the date of the expulsion. If the division superintendent or a committee of the school board denies such petition, the student may petition the school board for review of such denial.

Recommendations for expulsion for actions other than those specified in §§ 22.1-277.07 and 22.1-277.08 shall be based on consideration of the following factors:

The nature and seriousness of the violation;

The degree of danger to the school community;

The student’s disciplinary history, including the seriousness and number of previous infractions;

The appropriateness and availability of an alternative education placement or program;

The student’s age and grade level;

The results of any mental health, substance abuse, or special education assessments;

The student’s attendance and academic records; and

Such other matters as he deems appropriate.No decision to expel a student shall be reversed on the grounds that such factors were not considered.Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to preclude a school board from considering any of these factors as “special circumstances” for purposes of §§ 22.1-277.07 and 22.1-277.08.

History.

1998, c. 806, § 22.1-277.03; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2005, c. 96.

Cross references.

As to supervision of juvenile during commitment and on parole, see § 16.1-293.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 96, in the second sentence of the last paragraph in subsection B, deleted “the hearing and ruling on” preceding “any initial petition,” inserted “will be reviewed by the school board or a committee thereof, or the division superintendent, and,” and added the last sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 22.1-277.07.
Expulsion of students under certain circumstances; exceptions.

In compliance with the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994 (Part F-Gun-Free Schools Act of 1994), a school board shall expel from school attendance for a period of not less than one year any student whom such school board has determined, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article, to have possessed a firearm on school property or at a school-sponsored activity as prohibited by §

18.2-308.1

or to have possessed a firearm or destructive device as defined in subsection E, a firearm muffler or firearm silencer, or a pneumatic gun as defined in subsection E of §

15.2-915.4

on school property or at a school-sponsored activity. A school administrator, pursuant to school board policy, or a school board may, however, determine, based on the facts of a particular situation, that special circumstances exist and no disciplinary action or another disciplinary action or another term of expulsion is appropriate. A school board may promulgate guidelines for determining what constitutes special circumstances. In addition, a school board may, by regulation, authorize the division superintendent or his designee to conduct a preliminary review of such cases to determine whether a disciplinary action other than expulsion is appropriate. Such regulations shall ensure that, if a determination is made that another disciplinary action is appropriate, any such subsequent disciplinary action is to be taken in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a student’s expulsion regardless of the facts of the particular situation.

The Board of Education is designated as the state education agency to carry out the provisions of the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994 and shall administer the funds to be appropriated to the Commonwealth under this act.

Each school board shall revise its standards of student conduct no later than three months after the date on which this act becomes effective. Local school boards requesting moneys apportioned to the Commonwealth through the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994 shall submit to the Department of Education an application requesting such assistance. Applications for assistance shall include:

Documentation that the local school board has adopted and implemented student conduct policies in compliance with this section; and

A description of the circumstances pertaining to expulsions imposed under this section, including (i) the schools from which students were expelled under this section, (ii) the number of students expelled from each such school in the school division during the school year, and (iii) the types of firearms involved in the expulsions.

No school operating a Junior Reserve Officers Training Corps (JROTC) program shall prohibit the JROTC program from conducting marksmanship training when such training is a normal element of such programs. Such programs may include training in the use of pneumatic guns. The administration of a school operating a JROTC program shall cooperate with the JROTC staff in implementing such marksmanship training.

As used in this section:“Destructive device” means (i) any explosive, incendiary, or poison gas, bomb, grenade, rocket having a propellant charge of more than four ounces, missile having an explosive or incendiary charge of more than one-quarter ounce, mine, or other similar device; (ii) any weapon, except a shotgun or a shotgun shell generally recognized as particularly suitable for sporting purposes, by whatever name known that will, or may be readily converted to, expel a projectile by the action of an explosive or other propellant, and that has any barrel with a bore of more than one-half inch in diameter that is homemade or was not made by a duly licensed weapon manufacturer, any fully automatic firearm, any sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle as defined in §

18.2-299

or any firearm prohibited from civilian ownership by federal law; and (iii) any combination of parts either designed or intended for use in converting any device into any destructive device described in this subsection and from which a destructive device may be readily assembled. “Destructive device” does not include any device that is not designed or redesigned for use as a weapon, or any device originally designed for use as a weapon and that is redesigned for use as a signaling, pyrotechnic, line-throwing, safety, or other similar device, nor shall it include any antique firearm as defined in §

18.2-308.2:2

.“Firearm” means any weapon, including a starter gun, that will, or is designed or may readily be converted to, expel single or multiple projectiles by the action of an explosion of a combustible material or the frame or receiver of any such weapon. “Firearm” does not include any pneumatic gun, as defined in subsection E of §

15.2-915.4

.“One year” means 365 calendar days as required in federal regulations.“School property” means any real property owned or leased by the school board or any vehicle owned or leased by the school board or operated by or on behalf of the school board.

The exemptions set out in §§

18.2-308

and

18.2-308.016

regarding concealed weapons shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the provisions of this section. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons who possess such firearm or firearms or pneumatic guns as a part of the curriculum or other programs sponsored by the schools in the school division or any organization permitted by the school to use its premises or to any law-enforcement officer while engaged in his duties as such.

This section shall not be construed to diminish the authority of the Board of Education or the Governor concerning decisions on whether, or the extent to which, Virginia shall participate in the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994, or to diminish the Governor’s authority to coordinate and provide policy direction on official communications between the Commonwealth and the United States government.

History.

1995, cc. 724, 801; 1999, cc. 707, 1027; 2000, c. 523, § 22.1-277.01; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, cc. 843, 976; 2004, c. 930; 2006, c. 703; 2013, c. 288; 2014, cc. 109, 312, 765; 2016, c. 257; 2020, cc. 1111, 1112.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 843 inserted “or an air rifle or BB gun” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2003 amendment by c. 976 in subsection D, in the definition of ‘firearm,’ substituted “single or multiple projectiles by the action of an explosion of a combustible material” for “a projectile by the action of an explosive” in clause (i); and inserted the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 930, in subsection A, inserted “or destructive device” and substituted “E a firearm muffler or firearm silencer or a pneumatic gun as defined in subsection E of §

15.2-915.4

onto” for “D or an or rifle or BB gun on” in the first sentence; added present subsection D and redesignated former subsections D through F as present subsections E through G; in paragraph defining “Destructive device” inserted “that is homemade or was not made by a duly licensed weapon manufacturer, any fully automatic firearm, any sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle as defined in §

18.2-299

or any firearm prohibited from civilian ownership by federal law”; and added “nor shall it include any antique firearm as defined in subsection G of §

18.2-308.2:2

”; in the paragraph defining “Firearm” deleted “(i)” “(ii)” and “(iii) any firearm muffler or firearm silencer or (iv) any destructive device” from the first sentence; and rewrote the last sentence; and made a minor stylistic change; inserted “or pneumatic guns” following “firearm or firearms” in subsection F.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 703, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “possessed a firearm on school property or at” for “brought a firearm onto school property or to,” deleted “or” after “§

18.2-308.1

,” substituted “possessed a” for “brought,” and substituted “on school property or at” for “onto school property or to.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 288, in subsection E, substituted “does not include” for “shall not include” in the paragraphs defining “Destructive device” and “Firearm,” and deleted “any weapon prohibited on school property or at a school-sponsored activity pursuant to §

18.2-308.1

, or” following “means” near the beginning of the paragraph defining “Firearm.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 109, 312 and 765 are nearly identical and, in subsection A, added the last sentence. In addition, c. 765 made a minor stylistic change in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 257 substituted “§§” for “§” and inserted “and

18.2-308.016

” in subsection F.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1111 and 1112 are identical, and in subsection E in the definition of “Destructive device,” substituted “§

18.2-308.2:2

” for “subsection G of §

18.2-308.2:2

” in the last sentence at the end.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 22.1-277.07:1.
Policies prohibiting possession of firearms.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each school division may develop and implement procedures addressing disciplinary actions against students, and may establish disciplinary policies prohibiting the possession of firearms on school property, school buses, and at school-sponsored activities.

History.

2004, c. 560.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 560, cl. 2, provides: “That this act is declaratory of existing law.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

§ 22.1-277.08.
Expulsion of students for certain drug offenses.

School boards shall expel from school attendance any student whom such school board has determined, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article, to have brought a controlled substance, imitation controlled substance, or marijuana as defined in §

18.2-247

onto school property or to a school-sponsored activity. A school administrator, pursuant to school board policy, or a school board may, however, determine, based on the facts of a particular situation, that special circumstances exist and no disciplinary action or another disciplinary action or another term of expulsion is appropriate. A school board may, by regulation, authorize the division superintendent or his designee to conduct a preliminary review of such cases to determine whether a disciplinary action other than expulsion is appropriate. Such regulations shall ensure that, if a determination is made that another disciplinary action is appropriate, any such subsequent disciplinary action is to be taken in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a student’s expulsion regardless of the facts of the particular situation.

Each school board shall revise its standards of student conduct to incorporate the requirements of this section no later than three months after the date on which this act becomes effective.

History.

1998, c. 655; 1999, cc. 706, 732, § 22.1-277.01:1; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 109, 312, 577, 674, 719, 765.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410 are identical, effective March 23, 2011, and inserted “or synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” and made a related change in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 109, 312, and 765 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments by c. 577, in subsection A, substituted “A school administrator, pursuant to school board policy, or a school board may, however, determine, based on the facts of a particular situation, that special circumstances exist and no disciplinary action or another disciplinary action or another term of expulsion is appropriate. A” for “A school board may, however, determine, based on the facts of the particular case, that special circumstances exist and another disciplinary action is appropriate. In addition, a,” and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “or synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” and made a related change in the first sentence of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 22.1-277.1.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-277.1, relating to the disciplinary authority of school boards under certain circumstances, was derived from Acts 1990, c. 835; 1995, cc. 724, 755, 801; 1998, c. 355; 1999, c. 457; 2000, c. 577.